lexica/prepositions_rules.lexc
LEXICON Prep
LEXICON PrepNom

+Preposition+Nom: #;

LEXICON PrepGen

+Preposition+Gen: #;

LEXICON PrepDat

+Preposition+Dat: #;

LEXICON PrepAcc

+Preposition+Acc: #;

LEXICON PrepLoc

+Preposition+Loc: #;

LEXICON PrepIns

+Preposition+Ins: #;

! There are two special cases for prepositions, where the stem changes: h and s

LEXICON Prep

z+Preposition+Gen:s #;
z+Preposition+Ins:s #;
z+Preposition+Gen:z #;
z+Preposition+Ins:z #;
k+Preposition+Dat:h #;
k+Preposition+Dat:k #;
